Maine, session 132, LD2160.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA c. 13 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 13
SMALL DISTILLERIES
§231. Small distilleries
1. Prohibited fees. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the bureau
or a wholesale spirits provider may not charge a small distillery a spirits administration
services fee or a spirits trade marketing services fee on any sale of spirits, including, but
not limited to, on-premises sales, direct sales to out-of-state customers and direct sales to
licensed retailers in the State.
2. Inspection frequency. The bureau or any other entity of the State may not require
the inspection of a small distillery more frequently than once every 3 years.
3. Reporting frequency. The bureau or a wholesale spirits provider may not require
a small distillery to report more frequently than on a quarterly basis.
Sec. 2. 28-A MRSA §606, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 658, §91, is
further amended to read:
1-A. On-premises licensees; purchase from reselling agent or small distillery.
Except for a public service corporation that operates interstate, a person licensed to sell
spirits for on-premises consumption shall purchase spirits from a reselling agent or a small
distillery licensed in this State only, in accordance with this subsection. A licensee that
violates this subsection is subject to the administrative penalties provided in section
2074‑A.
A. The sale price of spirits sold by a reselling agent to an establishment licensed for
on-premises consumption must be the retail price established by the commission or the
discounted retail price established by the bureau in accordance with subsection 1‑C.
Page 1 - 132LR2709(01)

B. Upon completion of a transaction, the reselling agent and the on-premises licensee
shall each retain a copy of the licensee order form.
E. A person licensed to sell spirits for on-premises consumption may purchase spirits
from a small distillery licensed in this State.
Sec. 3. 28-A MRSA §1051, sub-§11 is enacted to read:
11. Small distilleries. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a licensed
small distillery is not required to be licensed under this chapter to sell beer, wine or spirits
manufactured by a small brewery, small winery or small distillery licensed under section
1355-A.
Sec. 4. 28-A MRSA §1355-A, sub-§5, ¶L is enacted to read:
L. Notwithstanding section 1551, a small distillery license is valid for 3 years.
Sec. 5. 28-A MRSA §1355-A, sub-§5, ¶M is enacted to read:
M. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the holder of a small
distillery license may sell or deliver its products to licensed retailers or wholesalers.
The licensee may sell, on the premises for off-premises consumption, spirits produced
at the licensed premises by the bottle, by the case or in bulk to licensed retailers,
including, but not limited to, off-premises retail licensees, restaurants and clubs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the holder of a small distillery
license may sell its products directly to a retail licensee under this paragraph without
selling to a wholesale licensee. A small distillery licensee shall keep and maintain
complete records on all sales to a retail licensee.
Sec. 6. 28-A MRSA §2076, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 658, §275, is
further amended to read:
1. Illegal delivery of spirits prohibited. Except with the bureau's written permission
or except as provided in section 503, subsection 1 for the wholesale spirits provider or in
section 459 for reselling agents, or in the case of a small distillery licensed under section
1355-A, subsection 5, a person may not knowingly transport or cause to be delivered to
any person other than the bureau any spirits not purchased from an agency liquor store.
Sec. 7. 28-A MRSA §2077-B, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Exception for small distilleries. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, this section does not prohibit a small distillery from selling, furnishing or
delivering spirits manufactured by the small distillery to a person outside of the State by
mail order.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.